apertium-es-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="/cokoliv__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cokoliv</l>
          <r>cokoliv<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čehokoliv</l>
          <r>cokoliv<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čemukoliv</l>
          <r>cokoliv<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cokoliv</l>
          <r>cokoliv<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čimkoliv</l>
          <r>cokoliv<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čemkoliv</l>
          <r>cokoliv<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ně/co__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čeho</l>
          <r>co<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čemu</l>
          <r>co<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čim</l>
          <r>co<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čem</l>
          <r>co<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Relatives -->
    <pardef n="kde__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="co__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>






    <!-- Nouns -->
    <pardef n="sí/h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hové</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hů</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hovi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hům</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hy</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hové</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hovi</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zích</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hem</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hy</l>
          <r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kmet__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ů</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ům</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cokoliv"><i></i><par n="/cokoliv__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="něco"><i>ně</i><par n="ně/co__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kde"><i>kde</i><par n="kde__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="co"><i>co</i><par n="co__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="chlap"><i>chlap</i><par n="kmet__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kmet"><i>kmet</i><par n="kmet__n"/></e>
    <e lm="síh"><i>sí</i><par n="sí/h__n"/></e>
